Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5206.01
Family practice
residents; funding of stipends and benefits.

(1) The Legislature may provide funding to the Office of Rural
Health for the purpose of funding the cost of resident stipends and benefits,
which funding may include health insurance, professional liability insurance,
disability insurance, medical education expenses, continuing competency expenses,
pension benefits, moving expenses, and meal expenses in family practice residency
programs based in Nebraska but which are not under a contract pursuant to
section 71-5206. The resident stipends and benefits funded in this section
shall apply only to residents who begin family practice residency training
at a qualifying institution in years beginning on or after January 1, 1993.
The total funding provided in the form of stipend and benefit support per
resident to a family practice residency program under this section shall not
exceed the total funding provided in the form of stipend and benefit support
per resident to a family practice residency program under section 71-5203.

(2) Upon receiving an itemized statement of the cost of stipends
and benefits of a family practice residency program from a sponsoring institution
and upon determining that the sponsoring institution is not receiving funds
under a contract pursuant to section 71-5206, the office may reimburse such
institution fifty percent of such cost for each family practice resident in
the program. The office may reimburse such institution twenty-five percent
of the remaining cost per family practice resident for each year that one
of the program's graduates practices family medicine in Nebraska, up to a
maximum of three years for each graduate, and an additional twenty-five percent
of the remaining cost per resident for each of the program's graduates who
practices family medicine in an area of Nebraska classified as of January
1, 1991, by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services as Medicare
Locale 16. The total number of residents receiving annual financial payments
made under this section shall not exceed nine students during any school year.

Laws 1993, LB 152, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 241, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 1021, § 89;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 120;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 29.